New York, session 2025-2026, S9574.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 234 of the real property law, as 2 added by chapter 789 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 4 where a tenant is a dwelling unit owner or shareholder of a cooperative 5 housing corporation, [other than a cooperative housing corporation 6 subject to the provisions of article two, article four, article five or 7 article eleven of the private housing finance law,] attorney's fees may 8 be awarded to either party in the event of default judgment if recovery 9 of attorney's fees is provided for in the proprietary lease or occupancy 10 agreement. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15334-01-6